Washington statutes.
RCW 25.05.536

Service of process.

Service of any process, notice, or demand required or permitted by law to be served upon the limited liability partnership may be made in accordance with RCW 23.95.450.

[ 2015 c 176 s 5112; 2009 c 437 s 7.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.